North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 1. Definitions and Statutory Construction.

§ 153A-1.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, or unless otherwise clearly required by the context, the words and phrases defined in this section have the meaning indicated when used in this Chapter.

“City” means a city as defined by

G.S. 160A-1(2)

, except that it does not include a city that, without regard to its date of incorporation, would be disqualified from receiving gasoline tax allocations by G.S. 136-41.2(a).

“Clerk” means the clerk to the board of commissioners.

“County” means any one of the counties listed in

G.S. 153A-10

.

“General law” means an act of the General Assembly that applies to all units of local government, to all counties, to all counties within a class defined by population or other criteria, to all cities, or to all cities within a class defined by population or other criteria, including a law that meets the foregoing standards but contains a clause or section exempting from its effect one or more counties, cities, or counties and cities.

“Local act” means an act of the General Assembly that applies to one or more specific counties, cities, or counties and cities by name. “Local act” is interchangeable with the terms “special act,” “special law,” “public-local act,” and “private act,” is used throughout this Chapter in preference to those terms, and means a local act as defined in this subdivision without regard to the terminology employed in local acts or other portions of the General Statutes.

“Publish,” “publication,” and other forms of the verb “to publish” mean insertion in a newspaper qualified under

G.S. 1-597

to publish legal advertisements in the county.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Guilford: 2017-210, s. 1(c) (applicable to notices published on or after December 1, 2017); New Hanover: 1983, c. 365.

§ 153A-2.
Effect on prior laws and actions taken pursuant to prior laws.

The provisions of this Chapter, insofar as they are the same in substance as laws in effect as of December 31, 1973, are intended to continue those laws in effect and not to be new enactments. The enactment of this Chapter does not require the readoption of any county or city ordinance adopted pursuant to laws that were in effect as of December 31, 1973, and that are restated or revised in this Chapter. The provisions of this Chapter do not affect any act heretofore done, any liability incurred, any right accrued or vested, or any suit or prosecution begun or cause of action accrued as of January 1, 1974.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-3.
Effect of Chapter on local acts.

Except as provided in this section, nothing in this Chapter repeals or amends a local act in effect as of January 1, 1974, or any portion of such an act, unless this Chapter or a subsequent enactment of the General Assembly clearly shows a legislative intent to repeal or supersede that local act.

If this Chapter and a local act each provide a procedure that contains every action necessary for the performance or execution of a power, right, duty, function, privilege, or immunity, the two procedures may be used in the alternative, and a county may follow either one.

If this Chapter and a local act each provide a procedure for the performance or execution of a power, right, duty, function, privilege, or immunity, but the local act procedure does not contain every action necessary for the performance or execution, the two procedures may be used in the alternative, and a county may follow either one; but the local act procedure shall be supplemented as necessary by this Chapter’s procedure. If a local act procedure is being supplemented in such a manner, and there is a conflict or inconsistency between the local act procedure and this Chapter’s procedure, the local act procedure shall be followed.

If a power, right, duty, function, privilege, or immunity is conferred on counties by this Chapter, and a local act enacted earlier than this Chapter omits or expressly denies or limits the same power, right, duty, function, privilege, or immunity, this Chapter supersedes the local act.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-4.
Broad construction.

It is the policy of the General Assembly that the counties of this State should have adequate authority to exercise the powers, rights, duties, functions, privileges, and immunities conferred upon them by law. To this end, the provisions of this Chapter and of local acts shall be broadly construed and grants of power shall be construed to include any powers that are reasonably expedient to the exercise of the power.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Toward a Comprehensive Program for Regulating Vacant or Abandoned Dwellings in North Carolina: The General Police Power, Minimum Housing Standards, and Vacant Property Registration,” see 32 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (2009).

For article, “Public Education, Local Authority, and Democracy: The Implied Power of North Carolina Counties to Impose School Impact Fees,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 239 (2011).

§ 153A-5.
Statutory references deemed amended to conform to Chapter.

If a reference is made in another portion of the General Statutes, in a local act, or in a city or county ordinance, resolution, or order to a portion of Chapter 153, and the reference is to Chapter 153 as it existed immediately before February 1, 1974, the reference is deemed amended to refer to that portion of this Chapter that most nearly corresponds to the repealed or superseded portion of Chapter 153.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§§ 153A-6 through 153A-9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.